North Carolina, session 2025, SB530.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-437.71 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.71. One North Carolina Fund established as a special revenue fund.
(a) Establishment. – The One North Carolina Fund is established as a special revenue
fund in the Department of Commerce.
(b) Purposes. – Moneys in the One North Carolina Fund may only be allocated pursuant
to this subsection. Moneys may be allocated to (i) local governments for use in connection with
securing commitments for the recruitment, expansion, or retention of new and existing businesses
and to businesses, (ii) the One North Carolina Small Business Account created pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section in an amount not to exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000).
($3,000,000), and (iii) the Agricultural Investment Grant Account created pursuant to subsection
(d) of this section in an amount not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). Moneys in the
One North Carolina Fund allocated to local governments shall be used for the following purposes
only:
(1) Installation or purchase of equipment.
(2) Structural repairs, improvements, or renovations to existing buildings to be
used for expansion.
(3) Construction of or improvements to new or existing water, sewer, gas, or
electric utility distribution lines or equipment for existing buildings.
(4) Construction of or improvements to new or existing water, sewer, gas, or
electric utility distribution lines or equipment for new or proposed buildings
to be used for manufacturing and industrial operations.
(5) Any other purposes specifically provided by an act of the General Assembly.
(b1) Awards. – The amounts committed in Governor's Letters issued in a single fiscal year
may not exceed seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000). Of the amount authorized in this
subsection, three million dollars ($3,000,000) is reserved for agreements with local governments
located in development tier three areas, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, with total employment
of 115,000 or less, using the data specified in G.S. 143B-437.52(c)(3).
(c) One North Carolina Small Business Account. – There is created in the One North
Carolina Fund a special account, the One North Carolina Small Business Account, to be used for
the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching
Funds Program, as specified in Part 2I of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
*S530-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Agricultural Manufacturing Investment Grant Account. – There is created in the One
North Carolina Fund a special account, the Agricultural Manufacturing Investment Grant
Account (AMIG), to be used to provide competitive grants to eligible agricultural manufacturers.
The Department shall administer the program and shall prioritize grants to recipients that the
Department determines will have the greatest net economic benefit at the regional and State
levels. In determining priority, the Department shall give preference to a project that satisfies one
or more of the following: (i) it is sited entirely within a development tier one or two area, as
defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, (ii) it incorporates, in a significant amount, as determined by the
Department, practices of precision agriculture, artificial-intelligence-driven automation,
biotechnology, or a combination thereof, and (iii) in which research and development
compensation is at least ten percent (10%) of the recipients annual payroll expenses. Grants to a
recipient under this subsection must comply with all of the following:
(1) A grant to a recipient may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in any single calendar year.
(2) A grant to a recipient may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) total.
(3) The grant term may not exceed five years.
(4) The Department certifies that the recipient has invested or intends to invest at
least five million dollars ($5,000,000) of private funds in improvements to
real property and additions to tangible personal property in the project within
a two-year period beginning with the time the grant is awarded.
(5) The recipient employs, and agrees to maintain for the entire grant term
employment of, at least 25 full-time employees or equivalent full-time
contract employees at the project that is the subject of the grant at the time the
grant is awarded.
(6) The recipient meets an average weekly wage that is at least equal to one
hundred ten percent (110%) of the average wage for all insured private
employers in the county.
(7) The Department requires the recipient to enter into an agreement requiring
that the recipient (i) meet performance criteria to protect the State's investment
and ensure that the projected benefits of the project are secured, including
employment level requirements, compensation requirements, investment
amount and time line requirements, and other criteria the Department
considers appropriate and (ii) repay or reimburse an appropriate portion of the
grant based on the extent of any failure to meet the performance criteria."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 530-First Edition